Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 6 Process, Notice and Lis Pendens

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

62B Am. Jur. 2d Process §§ 1 to 347.

Necessity, in service by leaving process at place of abode, etc., of leaving a copy of summons for each party sought to be served, 8 ALR2d 343.

What amounts to doing business in a state within statute providing for service of process in action against nonresident natural person or persons doing business in state, 10 ALR2d 200.

Foreign corporation's purchase within state of goods to be shipped into other state or country as doing business within state for purposes of service of process, 12 ALR2d 1439.

Jurisdiction of suit involving trust as affected by service, 15 ALR2d 610.

Ownership or control by foreign corporation of stock of other corporation as constituting doing business within state under statutes providing for service of process, 18 ALR2d 187.

Use of criminal process as ruse or pretense to obtain service on defendant in civil action, 20 ALR2d 163.

Power of state to subject foreign corporation to jurisdiction of its courts on sole ground that corporation committed tort within state, 25 ALR2d 1202.

Who is an “agent authorized by appointment” to receive service of process within purview of federal rules of civil procedure and similar state rules and statutes, 26 ALR2d 1086.

Immunity from service of process of nonresident witness appearing in other than strictly judicial proceedings, 35 ALR2d 1353.

Omission of signature of issuing officer on civil process or summons as affecting jurisdiction of the person, 37 ALR2d 928.

What constitutes doing business within state by foreign magazine, newspaper or other publishing corporation for purposes other than taxation, 38 ALR2d 747.

Power to grant annulment of marriage against nonresident on constructive service, 43 ALR2d 1086.

Foreign insurance company as subject to service of process in action on policy, 44 ALR2d 416.

Application of doctrine of idem sonans or the like to substitute or constructive service of process, 45 ALR2d 1090.

Immunity from service of process of public officer while attending court in official capacity, 45 ALR2d 1100.

Service of process on person in military service by serving person at civilian abode or residence or by leaving copy there, 46 ALR2d 1239.

Constructive or substituted service upon domiciliary or resident of forum in action to enjoin suit in another state or country for divorce or separation, 54 ALR2d 1240.

Sufficiency of notice to, or service upon, contemnor's attorney in civil contempt proceedings, 60 ALR2d 1244.

Service on dissolved domestic corporation in absence of express statutory direction, 75 ALR2d 1399.

Who may serve writ, summons or notice of garnishment, 75 ALR2d 1437.

State's power to subject nonresident individual other than a motorist to jurisdiction of its courts in action for tort committed within state, 78 ALR2d 397.

Failure to make return as affecting validity of service or court's jurisdiction, 82 ALR2d 668.

Holding directors', officers', stockholders' or sales meetings or conventions in a state by foreign corporation as doing business or otherwise subjecting it to service of process and suit, 84 ALR2d 412.

Immunity from service of process as affected by relationship between subject matters of litigation in which process was issued and litigation which nonresident served was attending, 84 ALR2d 421.

Manner of service of process upon foreign corporation which has withdrawn from state, 86 ALR2d 1000.

Permissible modes of service of notice of eminent domain proceedings, 89 ALR2d 1404.

Sufficiency of designation of court or place of appearance in original civil process, 93 ALR2d 376.

Validity of service of process on nonresident owner of watercraft under state “long-arm” statutes, 99 ALR2d 287.

Mistake or error in middle initial or middle name of party as vitiating or invalidating civil process, summons or the like, 6 ALR3d 1179.

Attorney representing foreign corporation in litigation as its agent for service of process in unconnected actions or proceedings, 9 ALR3d 738.

Jurisdiction on constructive or substituted service in suit for divorce or alimony to reach property within state, 10 ALR3d 212.

Validity, construction and application of statute making a foreign corporation subject to action arising out of contract made within the state, although such corporation was not doing business therein, 27 ALR3d 397.

Civil liability of one making false or fraudulent return of process, 31 ALR3d 1393.

Construction and application of phrase “usual place of abode,” or similar terms in statutes relating to service of process, 32 ALR3d 112.

Validity of service of summons or complaint on Sunday or holiday, 63 ALR3d 423.

Civil liability of judicial officer for abuse of process, 64 ALR3d 1251.

In personam jurisdiction, under long-arm statute, over nonresident physician, dentist, or hospital in medical malpractice action, 25 ALR4th 706.

Abuse of process action based on misuse of discovery or deposition procedures after commencement of civil action without seizure of person or property, 33 ALR4th 650.

54 C.J.S. Lis Pendens § 1 et seq; 66 C.J.S. Notice §§ 1 to 23; 72 C.J.S. Process §§ 1 to 114.